Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 3. Vermont Reports

§ 1191.
Publication.

The Court Administrator shall contract with an appropriate law book publisher for the editing and printing of the volumes and advance reports of the Vermont Reports.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 52

, § 2, eff. April 10, 1969;

1971, No. 119

, § 1, eff. April 26, 1971.

§ 1192.
Repealed. 1991, No. 245 (Adj. Sess.), § 94(b).

§ 1193.
Repealed.
1975, No. 246 (Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 1193a.
Sale and exchange of surplus copies.

The surplus volumes of Vermont Reports may be sold, the price to be fixed by the State Librarian.

HISTORY:

Added

1975, No. 246

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1995, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 4(a), eff. May 6, 1996;

1997, No. 59

, § 19, eff. June 30, 1997.